Utah statutes.
63A-1-114.   Rate Committee -- Membership -- Duties.

(1) (a)  There is created a Rate Committee which shall consist of:

(i)  the executive director of the Governor's Office of Management and Budget, or a designee;

(ii)  the executive directors of three state agencies that use services and pay rates to one of the department internal service funds, or their designee, appointed by the governor for a two-year term;

(iii)  the executive director of the Department of Administrative Services, or a designee;

(iv)  the director of the Division of Finance, or a designee; and

(v)  the chief information officer.

(b) (i)  The committee shall elect a chair from its members, except that the chair may not be from an agency that receives payment of a rate set by the committee.

(ii)  Members of the committee who are state government employees and who do not receive salary, per diem, or expenses from their agency for their service on the committee shall receive no compensation, benefits, per diem, or expenses for the members' service on the committee.

(c)  The Department of Administrative Services shall provide staff services to the committee.

(2) (a)  A division described in Section 63A-1-109 that manages an internal service fund shall submit to the committee a proposed rate and fee schedule for services rendered by the division to an executive branch entity or an entity that subscribes to services rendered by the division.

(b)  The committee shall:

(i)  conduct meetings in accordance with Title 52, Chapter 4, Open and Public Meetings Act;

(ii)  review the proposed rate and fee schedules and may approve, increase, or decrease the rate and fee;

(iii)  recommend a proposed rate and fee schedule for each internal service fund to:

(A)  the Governor's Office of Management and Budget; and

(B)  the legislative appropriations subcommittees that, in accordance with Section 63J-1-410, approve the internal service fund agency's rates, fees, and budget; and

(iv)  review and approve, increase or decrease an interim rate, fee, or amount when an internal service fund agency begins a new service or introduces a new product between annual general sessions of the Legislature.

(c)  The committee may in accordance with Subsection 63J-1-410(4), decrease a rate, fee, or amount that has been approved by the Legislature.



Amended by Chapter 310, 2013 General Session

